Utah statutes.
10-9a-509.7.   Transferable development rights.

(1)  A municipality may adopt an ordinance:

(a)  designating sending zones and receiving zones within the municipality; and

(b)  allowing the transfer of a transferable development right from a sending zone to a receiving zone.

(2)  A municipality may not allow the use of a transferable development right unless the municipality adopts an ordinance described in Subsection (1).



Amended by Chapter 231, 2012 General Session

